Texas, session 891, SB27.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 25.2704(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  In addition to the jurisdiction provided by Section 25.0003 and other law, the 2nd Multicounty Court at Law has concurrent jurisdiction with the district courts, including [except] in civil cases in which the matter in controversy exceeds the maximum amount provided by Section 25.0003(c)(1). SECTION 2.  Section 152.0191(a), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The juvenile board of Bee County is composed of the county judge, [and] the district judges in Bee County, and the judge of the 2nd Multicounty Court at Law. SECTION 3.  Section 152.1551(a), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The juvenile board of Live Oak County is composed of the county judge, [and] the district judges in Live Oak County, and the judge of the 2nd Multicounty Court at Law. SECTION 4.  Section 152.1621(a), Human Resources Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  The juvenile board of McMullen County is composed of the county judge, [and] the district judges in McMullen County, and the judge of the 2nd Multicounty Court at Law. SECTION 5.  Section 25.2704(a), Government Code, as amended by this Act, applies only to a case filed or proceeding commenced on or after the effective date of this Act.  A case filed or proceeding commenced before that date is governed by the law in effect on the date the case was filed or the proceeding was commenced, and the former law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 6.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.